tests/heb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%<v%>
%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>
%<sg%>
%<pl%>
%<perf%>
%<impf%>
%<m%>
%<f%>

%{V1%}
%{V2%}


%[%+1sg%] %[%+1pl%] %[%+2sgm%] %[%+2sgf%] %[%+2plm%] %[%+2plf%] %[%+3sgm%] %[%+3sgf%] %[%+3plm%] %[%+3plf%]
%[%-1sg%] %[%-1pl%] %[%-2sgm%] %[%-2sgf%] %[%-2plm%] %[%-2plf%] %[%-3sgm%] %[%-3sgf%] %[%-3plm%] %[%-3plf%]

%[perf%]
%[impf%]

LEXICON Root
%[%+1sg%]:%[impf%]אֶ VerbRoot ;
%[%+1pl%]:%[impf%]נִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+2sgm%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+2sgf%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+2plm%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+2plf%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+3sgm%]:%[impf%]יִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+3sgf%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+3plm%]:%[impf%]יִ VerbRoot ;
%[%+3plf%]:%[impf%]תִ VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;

LEXICON VerbInflSuf
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%[%-1sg%]:%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%[%-1pl%]:%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<m%>%[%-2sgm%]:%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<f%>%[%-2sgf%]:ִי%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<m%>%[%-2plm%]:ו%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<f%>%[%-2plf%]:נָה%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>%[%-3sgm%]:%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<f%>%[%-3sgf%]:%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<m%>%[%-3plm%]:ו%[impf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<f%>%[%-3plf%]:נָה%[impf%] # ;

%<v%>%<impf%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:תִי%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:נו%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<m%>:תָ%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<f%>:ת%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<m%>:תֶמ%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<f%>:תֶנ%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<f%>:ָה%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<m%>:ו%[perf%] # ;
%<v%>%<impf%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<f%>:ו%[perf%] # ;


LEXICON VerbRoot
אכל:א%{V1%}כ%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
אכף:א%{V1%}כ%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
אמר:א%{V1%}מ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
אסף:א%{V1%}ס%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
אסר:א%{V1%}ס%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
ארך:א%{V1%}ר%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
אשר:א%{V1%}ש%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
בחר:ב%{V1%}ח%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
בלע:ב%{V1%}ל%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
ברח:ב%{V1%}ר%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
גאל:ג%{V1%}א%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
גדל:ג%{V1%}ד%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
גזז:ג%{V1%}ז%{V2}ז VerbInflSuf ;
גזר:ג%{V1%}ז%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
גנב:ג%{V1%}נ%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
גנח:ג%{V1%}נ%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
גרד:ג%{V1%}ר%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
דחס:ד%{V1%}ח%{V2}ס VerbInflSuf ;
דעך:ד%{V1%}ע%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
היה:ה%{V1%}י%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
הלך:ה%{V1%}ל%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
הפך:ה%{V1%}פ%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
הפר:ה%{V1%}פ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
הרג:ה%{V1%}ר%{V2}ג VerbInflSuf ;
הרס:ה%{V1%}ר%{V2}ס VerbInflSuf ;
זכה:ז%{V1%}כ%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
זרח:ז%{V1%}ר%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
זרק:ז%{V1%}ר%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
חבר:ח%{V1%}ב%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
חדר:ח%{V1%}ד%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
חלב:ח%{V1%}ל%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
חלה:ח%{V1%}ל%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
חלם:ח%{V1%}ל%{V2}ם VerbInflSuf ;
חנק:ח%{V1%}נ%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
חסם:ח%{V1%}ס%{V2}ם VerbInflSuf ;
חפר:ח%{V1%}פ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
חפש:ח%{V1%}פ%{V2}ש VerbInflSuf ;
חשב:ח%{V1%}ש%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
חשף:ח%{V1%}ש%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
טחן:ט%{V1%}ח%{V2}ן VerbInflSuf ;
טעם:ט%{V1%}ע%{V2}ם VerbInflSuf ;
טרף:ט%{V1%}ר%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
ידע:י%{V1%}ד%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
יכל:י%{V1%}כ%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
יצא:י%{V1%}צ%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
יצר:י%{V1%}צ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
ירד:י%{V1%}ר%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
ירק:י%{V1%}ר%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
ישב:י%{V1%}ש%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
ישן:י%{V1%}ש%{V2}ן VerbInflSuf ;
כלל:כ%{V1%}ל%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
כתב:כ%{V1%}ת%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
לחץ:ל%{V1%}ח%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
לקח:ל%{V1%}ק%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
מדד:מ%{V1%}ד%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
מחא:מ%{V1%}ח%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
מכר:מ%{V1%}כ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
מסר:מ%{V1%}ס%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
מצא:מ%{V1%}צ%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
מרח:מ%{V1%}ר%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
משך:מ%{V1%}ש%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
נגע:נ%{V1%}ג%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
נזף:נ%{V1%}ז%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
נצץ:נ%{V1%}צ%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
נשא:נ%{V1%}ש%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
נשך:נ%{V1%}ש%{V2}ך VerbInflSuf ;
נתן:נ%{V1%}ת%{V2}ן VerbInflSuf ;
סגר:ס%{V1%}ג%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
סדק:ס%{V1%}ד%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
סחט:ס%{V1%}ח%{V2}ט VerbInflSuf ;
סלח:ס%{V1%}ל%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
ספר:ס%{V1%}פ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
סרח:ס%{V1%}ר%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
סתם:ס%{V1%}ת%{V2}ם VerbInflSuf ;
עבד:ע%{V1%}ב%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
עזב:ע%{V1%}ז%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
עזר:ע%{V1%}ז%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
עכר:ע%{V1%}כ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
עמד:ע%{V1%}מ%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
עצר:ע%{V1%}צ%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
עשה:ע%{V1%}ש%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
עשק:ע%{V1%}ש%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
פגע:פ%{V1%}ג%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
פנה:פ%{V1%}נ%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
פרם:פ%{V1%}ר%{V2}ם VerbInflSuf ;
פרץ:פ%{V1%}ר%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
פרק:פ%{V1%}ר%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
פשט:פ%{V1%}ש%{V2}ט VerbInflSuf ;
פתח:פ%{V1%}ת%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
צבט:צ%{V1%}ב%{V2}ט VerbInflSuf ;
צבע:צ%{V1%}ב%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
צחק:צ%{V1%}ח%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
צלל:צ%{V1%}ל%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
צעק:צ%{V1%}ע%{V2}ק VerbInflSuf ;
קבל:ק%{V1%}ב%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
קבר:ק%{V1%}ב%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
קפץ:ק%{V1%}פ%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
קצץ:ק%{V1%}צ%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
קרא:ק%{V1%}ר%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
קרב:ק%{V1%}ר%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
קרה:ק%{V1%}ר%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
קשר:ק%{V1%}ש%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
ראה:ר%{V1%}א%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
רזה:ר%{V1%}ז%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
רכב:ר%{V1%}כ%{V2}ב VerbInflSuf ;
רעד:ר%{V1%}ע%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
רצה:ר%{V1%}צ%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
רקד:ר%{V1%}ק%{V2}ד VerbInflSuf ;
רתח:ר%{V1%}ת%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
שאל:ש%{V1%}א%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
שבר:ש%{V1%}ב%{V2}ר VerbInflSuf ;
שחה:ש%{V1%}ח%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
שטף:ש%{V1%}ט%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
שלח:ש%{V1%}ל%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
שלל:ש%{V1%}ל%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
שמח:ש%{V1%}מ%{V2}ח VerbInflSuf ;
שמע:ש%{V1%}מ%{V2}ע VerbInflSuf ;
שנא:ש%{V1%}נ%{V2}א VerbInflSuf ;
שקט:ש%{V1%}ק%{V2}ט VerbInflSuf ;
שקל:ש%{V1%}ק%{V2}ל VerbInflSuf ;
שרף:ש%{V1%}ר%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
שרץ:ש%{V1%}ר%{V2}ץ VerbInflSuf ;
שתה:ש%{V1%}ת%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
תלה:ת%{V1%}ל%{V2}ה VerbInflSuf ;
תסס:ת%{V1%}ס%{V2}ס VerbInflSuf ;
תפס:ת%{V1%}פ%{V2}ס VerbInflSuf ;
תקף:ת%{V1%}ק%{V2}ף VerbInflSuf ;
